South Dakota, session 2026, HB1189.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 32-22-21 be AMENDED:
32-22-21. No vehicle equipped with pneumatic tires may be operated or moved
upon any highway in this state, if the weight of the vehicle and the load thereon resting
upon the surface of the highway exceeds:
(1) Six hundred fifty pounds on any inch of the tire width on any type of axle
permanently attached to a mobile crane, moving upon any highway in this state,
with a boom carried over the vehicle and operating with a permit issued under
§ 32-22-42;
(2) Six hundred pounds on any inch of the tire width on:
(a) An axle equipped with dual tires;
(b) A steering axle;
(c) An axle of an oversize or overweight vehicle that cannot be readily reduced
in size or weight and is operating with a permit issued under § 32-22-42;
(d) An axle of a trailer being towed by a vehicle with a gross vehicle weight
rating of eleven thousand pounds or less; or
(e) An axle equipped with tires having a minimum width of four hundred forty-
five millimeters or seventeen and one-half inches if operated on a highway
identified in § 32-22-21.2; or
(3) Five hundred pounds on any inch of the tire width on any other type of axle.
In no instance may the weight on any axle or combination of axles exceed the
maximum weight limits specified in § 32-22-16. A violation of this section is a Class 2
misdemeanor.

26.892.11 2 1189
For the purposes of this section, "mobile crane" means a lifting machine mounted
on a self-propelled carrier, featuring a telescoping or lattice boom, designed to easily move
between work sites for lifting and moving heavy materials.
HB1189 ENROLLED

26.892.11 3 1189
An Act to establish a greater tire weight limit for a mobile crane moving on any highway in
this state.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1189
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1189 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1189 ENROLLED